Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 4. General Principles of Justification.

Sec. 11.81.300.
Justification: Defense.

Except as otherwise specified in this title, justification as provided in AS

11.81.320

—

11.81.430

is a defense.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 25 ch 102 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

Definition of “defense” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: II, 68.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

Sec. 11.81.320.
Justification: Necessity.

Conduct which would otherwise be an offense is justified by reason of necessity to the extent permitted by common law when

neither this title nor any other statute defining the offense provides exemptions or defenses dealing with the justification of necessity in the specific situation involved; and

a legislative intent to exclude the justification of necessity does not otherwise plainly appear.

The justification specified in (a) of this section is an affirmative defense.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 11 ch 143 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Justification: defense — AS

11.81.300

Defense: emergency use of premises — AS

11.46.340

Definition of “affirmative defense” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: II, 48-49.

Sec. 11.81.330.
Justification: Use of nondeadly force in defense of self.

A person is justified in using nondeadly force upon another when and to the extent the person reasonably believes it is necessary for self-defense against what the person reasonably believes to be the use of unlawful force by the other person, unless

the person used the force in mutual combat not authorized by law;

the person claiming self-defense provoked the other’s conduct with intent to cause physical injury to the other;

the person claiming self-defense was the initial aggressor; or

the force used was the result of using a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument the person claiming self-defense possessed while

acting alone or with others to further a felony criminal objective of the person or one or more other persons;

a participant in a felony transaction or purported transaction or in immediate flight from a felony transaction or purported transaction in violation of AS 11.71; or

acting alone or with others in revenge for, retaliation for, or response to actual or perceived conduct by a rival or perceived rival, or a member or perceived member of a rival group, if the person using deadly force, or the group on whose behalf the person is acting, has a history or reputation for violence among civilians.

A person who is not justified in using force in self-defense in the circumstances listed in (a)(1) — (3) of this section is justified in using force in self-defense if that person has withdrawn from the encounter and effectively communicated the withdrawal to the other person, but the other person persists in continuing the incident by the use of unlawful force.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 17 ch 124 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 68 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 32(a), ch. 124, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2004.”

Sec. 11.81.335.
Justification: Use of deadly force in defense of self.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who is justified in using nondeadly force in self-defense under AS

11.81.330

may use deadly force in self-defense upon another person when and to the extent the person reasonably believes the use of deadly force is necessary for self-defense against

death;

serious physical injury;

kidnapping, except for what is described as custodial interference in the first degree in AS

11.41.320

;

sexual assault in the first degree;

sexual assault in the second degree;

sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree; or

robbery in any degree.

A person may not use deadly force under this section if the person knows that, with complete personal safety and with complete safety as to others being defended, the person can avoid the necessity of using deadly force by leaving the area of the encounter, except there is no duty to leave the area if the person is

on premises

that the person owns or leases;

where the person resides, temporarily or permanently; or

as a guest or express or implied agent of the owner, lessor, or resident;

a peace officer acting within the scope and authority of the officer’s employment or a person assisting a peace officer under AS

11.81.380

;

in a building where the person works in the ordinary course of the person’s employment;

protecting a child or a member of the person’s household; or

in any other place where the person has a right to be.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 10 ch 4 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 68 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intentionally,” “nondeadly force,” “force,” “physical injury,” “serious physical injury,” “premises,” “peace officer,” “leased” — AS

11.81.900

Kidnapping — AS

11.41.300

Robbery — AS

11.41.500

,

11.41.510

Use of force in defense of a third person — AS

11.81.340

Use of force in defense of property — AS

11.81.350

Use of force in making an arrest or terminating an escape- AS

11.81.370

—

11.81.390

Justification: defense — AS

11.81.300

.

Original Code Provision — AS 11.15.100.

TD: II, 49-53.

For defenses to murder, see AS

11.41.115

.

Sec. 11.81.340.
Justification: Use of force in defense of a third person.

A person is justified in using force upon another when and to the extent the person reasonably believes it is necessary to defend a third person when, under the circumstances as the person claiming defense of another reasonably believes them to be, the third person would be justified under AS

11.81.330

or

11.81.335

in using that degree of force for self-defense.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 68 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

Definition of “force” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Use of nondeadly and deadly force in defense of self — AS 11.81. 11.81.335

Justification: defense — AS

11.81.300

Original Code Provision — AS 11.15.100.

TD: II, 53-54.

Sec. 11.81.350.
Justification: Use of force in defense of property and premises.

A person may use nondeadly force upon another when and to the extent the person reasonably believes it is necessary to terminate what the person reasonably believes to be the commission or attempted commission by the other of an unlawful taking or damaging of property or services.

A person may use deadly force upon another when and to the extent the person reasonably believes it necessary to terminate what the person reasonably believes to be the commission or attempted commission of arson upon a dwelling or occupied building.

A person in possession or control of any premises, or a guest or an express or implied agent of that person, may use

nondeadly force upon another when and to the extent the person reasonably believes it is necessary to terminate what the person reasonably believes to be the commission or attempted commission by the other of criminal trespass in any degree upon the premises;

deadly force upon another when and to the extent the person reasonably believes it is necessary to terminate what the person reasonably believes to be a burglary in any degree occurring in an occupied dwelling or building.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 68 SLA 2006.]

A person

in a vehicle, or forcibly removed from a vehicle, may use deadly force upon another when and to the extent the person reasonably believes it is necessary to terminate what the person reasonably believes to be a carjacking of that vehicle at or about the time the vehicle is carjacked;

outside of a vehicle may use deadly force upon another when and to the extent the person reasonably believes it is necessary to terminate what the person reasonably believes to be the theft of that vehicle when another person, other than the perceived offender, is inside of the vehicle; this paragraph does not apply to a person outside of a vehicle who is involved in a dispute with a person inside of the vehicle who is a household member of that person; in this paragraph, “household member” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

.

A person justified in using force under this section does not have a duty to leave or attempt to leave the area of the encounter before using force.

In (e) of this section,

“carjacking” means a robbery involving the taking or attempted taking of a vehicle from a person in possession of the vehicle;

“vehicle” means a “motor vehicle” as defined in AS

28.90.990

, an aircraft, or a watercraft.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 68 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

Definition of “nondeadly force,” “property,” “services,” “deadly force,” “dwelling,” “building,” “premises” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Theft defined — AS

11.46.100

Criminal mischief in the first, second, third, and fourth degree — AS

11.46.480

—

11.46.486

Arson in the first and second degree — AS

11.46.400

,

11.46.410

Criminal trespass in the first and second degree — AS

11.46.320

,

11.46.330

Burglary in the first and second degree — AS

11.46.300

,

11.46.310

Use of force in defense of self — AS

11.81.330

,

11.81.335

Justification: defense — AS

11.81.300

Original Code Provision — AS 11.15.100.

TD: II, 54-58.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, “AS

28.90.990

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.100

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.100

.

Sec. 11.81.370.
Justification: Use of force by a peace officer in making an arrest or terminating an escape.

In addition to using force justified under other sections of this chapter, a peace officer may use nondeadly force and may threaten to use deadly force when and to the extent the officer reasonably believes it necessary to make an arrest, to terminate an escape or attempted escape from custody, or to make a lawful stop. The officer may use deadly force only when and to the extent the officer reasonably believes the use of deadly force is necessary to make the arrest or terminate the escape or attempted escape from custody of a person the officer reasonably believes

has committed or attempted to commit a felony which involved the use of force against a person;

has escaped or is attempting to escape from custody while in possession of a firearm on or about the person; or

may otherwise endanger life or inflict serious physical injury unless arrested without delay.

The use of force in making an arrest or stop is not justified under this section unless the peace officer reasonably believes the arrest or stop is lawful.

Nothing in this section prohibits or restricts a peace officer in preparing to use or threatening to use a dangerous instrument.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “force,” “peace officer,” “nondeadly force,” “deadly force,” “firearm,” “serious physical injury,” “dangerous instrument” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Use of force in defense of self — AS

11.81.330

— .335

Use of force in making an arrest — AS

11.81.380

— .390

Use of force in resisting with arrest — AS

11.81.400

Use of force by guards — AS

11.81.410

Justification: defense — AS

11.81.300

Limitation on restraint in arrest — AS

12.25.070

Means to effect resisted arrest — AS

12.25.080

Original Code Provision — AS 11.15.090.

TD: II, 59-62.

Sec. 11.81.380.
Justification: Use of force by private person assisting an arrest or terminating an escape.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who has been directed by another who that person reasonably believes to be a peace officer to assist in making an arrest or terminating or preventing an escape may use nondeadly force when and to the extent the person reasonably believes it necessary to carry out the peace officer’s direction. A person may use deadly force under this section only when the person reasonably believes it necessary to carry out the peace officer’s direction to use deadly force.

The use of force under (a) of this section is not justified if the person believes that the peace officer is not justified in using that degree of force under the circumstances.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “peace officer,” “nondeadly force,” “deadly force” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Use of force in defense of self — AS

11.81.330

,

11.81.335

Use of force by private person in making an arrest — AS 11.81.39

Refusing to assist a peace officer or judicial officer — AS

11.56.720

Justification: defense — AS

11.81.300

Original Code Provision — AS 11.15.090.

TD: II, 62-63.

Sec. 11.81.390.
Use of force by a private person in making arrest or terminating an escape.

In addition to using force justified under other sections of this chapter, a person, acting as a private person, may use nondeadly force to make the arrest or terminate the escape or attempted escape from custody of a person who the private person reasonably believes has committed a misdemeanor in the private person’s presence or a felony when and to the extent the private person reasonably believes it necessary to make that arrest or terminate that escape or attempted escape from custody.
A private person may use deadly force under this section only when and to the extent the private person reasonably believes the use of deadly force is necessary to make the arrest or terminate the escape or attempted escape from custody of another who the private person reasonably believes

has committed or attempted to commit a felony which involved the use of force against a person; or

has escaped or is attempting to escape from custody while in possession of a firearm on or about the person.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “force,” “nondeadly force,” “misdemeanor,” “felony,” “deadly force,” “possession,” “firearm” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Use of force by private person assisting an arrest or terminating an escape — AS

11.81.380

Use of force in defense of self — AS

11.81.330

,

11.81.335

Use of force in defense of property and premises — AS

11.81.350

Justification: defense — AS

11.81.300

Original Code Provision — AS 11.15.100.

TD: II, 63-65.

Sec. 11.81.400.
Justification: Use of force in resisting or interfering with arrest.

A person may not use force to resist personal arrest or interfere with the arrest of another by a peace officer who is known by the person, or reasonably appears, to be a peace officer, whether the arrest is lawful or unlawful, unless

the force used by the peace officer exceeds that allowed under AS

11.81.370

.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 63 SLA 1982.]

The use of force justified under this section in resisting arrest or interfering with the arrest of another may not exceed the use of force justified under AS

11.81.330

or

11.81.335

.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 63 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed, § 1 ch 63 SLA 1982.]

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 26 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Definition of “force,” “peace officer” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Use of force in defense of self — AS

11.81.330

,

11.81.335

Use of force by peace officer in making an arrest or terminating an escape — AS

11.81.370

Resisting or interfering with arrest — AS

11.56.700

Justification: defense — AS

11.81.300

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: II, 66.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

Sec. 11.81.410.
Justification: Use of force by guards.

In addition to using force justified under other sections of this chapter, a guard or peace officer employed in a correctional facility may, if authorized by regulations adopted by the Department of Corrections, use nondeadly force upon another person when and to the extent reasonably necessary and appropriate to maintain order.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a guard or peace officer employed in a correctional facility or a peace officer in the immediate vicinity of a correctional facility at the time of an escape from the facility may use deadly force when and to the extent the guard or peace officer reasonably believes it necessary to terminate the escape or attempted escape of a prisoner from the correctional facility.

The use of deadly force under (b) of this section is not justified if the guard or peace officer knows that the prisoner was under official detention in the correctional facility on a charge of a misdemeanor and does not believe that the prisoner is armed with a firearm, in which event only nondeadly force may be used.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “peace officer,” “correctional facility,” “nondeadly force,” “deadly force,” “official detention,” “firearm” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Use of force by peace officer in making an arrest or terminating an escape — AS

11.81.370

Escape in the first, second, third, and fourth degree - AS

11.56.300

—

11.56.330

Justification: defense — AS

11.81.300

Retaking escaped prisoner — AS

12.25.120

Original Code Provision — AS 11.15.090; AS

12.25.130

.

TD: II, 66-67.

Revisor’s notes. —

Under § 48, E.O. 55, “Department of Corrections” was substituted for “Department of Health and Social Services” in 1984 in subsection (a) of this section.

Administrative Code. —

For security, see 22 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 11.81.420.
Justification: Performance of public duty.

Unless inconsistent with AS

11.81.320

—

11.81.410

, conduct which would otherwise constitute an offense is justified when it is required or authorized by law or by a judicial decree, judgment, or order.

The justification afforded by this section also applies when

the person reasonably believes the conduct to be required or authorized by a decree, judgment, or order of a court of competent jurisdiction or in the lawful execution of legal process, notwithstanding lack of jurisdiction of the court or defect in the legal process; or

the person reasonably believes the conduct to be required or authorized to assist a peace officer in the performance of the officer’s duties, notwithstanding that the officer exceeded the officer’s authority.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “law,” “peace officer” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Justification: defense — AS

11.81.300

Original Code Provision — AS 11.15.090.

TD: V, 14-15.

Sec. 11.81.430.
Justification: Use of force, special relationships.

The use of force on another person that would otherwise constitute an offense is justified under any of the following circumstances:

When and to the extent reasonably necessary and appropriate to promote the welfare of the child or incompetent person, a parent, guardian, or other person entrusted with the care and supervision of a child under 18 years of age or an incompetent person may use reasonable and appropriate nondeadly force on that child or incompetent person.

When and to the extent reasonably necessary and appropriate to maintain order and when the use of force is consistent with the welfare of the students, a teacher may, if authorized by school regulations and the principal of the school, use reasonable and appropriate nondeadly force on a student. If authorized by school regulations and the principal of the school, a teacher may use nondeadly force under this paragraph in any situation in which the teacher is responsible for the supervision of students. A teacher employed by a school board, including a regional educational attendance area school board, may use nondeadly force under this paragraph only if the school regulations authorizing the use of force have been adopted by the school board.

When and to the extent reasonably necessary and appropriate to maintain order, a person responsible for the maintenance of order in a common carrier of passengers, or a person acting under that person’s direction, may use reasonable and appropriate nondeadly force.

When and to the extent reasonably necessary to prevent a suicide, a person who reasonably believes that another is imminently about to commit suicide may use reasonable and appropriate nondeadly force on that person.

A licensed physician, licensed mobile intensive care paramedic, or registered or advanced practice registered nurse; or a person acting under the direction of a licensed physician, licensed mobile intensive care paramedic, or registered or advanced practice registered nurse; or any person who renders emergency care at the scene of an emergency, may use reasonable and appropriate nondeadly force for the purpose of administering a recognized and lawful form of treatment that is reasonably adapted to promoting the physical or mental health of the patient if

the treatment is administered with the consent of the patient or, if the patient is a child under 18 years of age or an incompetent person, with the consent of the parent, guardian, or other person entrusted with care and supervision of the child or incompetent person; or

the treatment is administered in an emergency if the person administering the treatment reasonably believes that no one competent to consent can be consulted under the circumstances and that a reasonable person, wishing to safeguard the welfare of the patient, would consent.

A person who raises a defense under (a)(1) of this section and claims that the person upon whom force was used was an incompetent person has the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that, at the time force was used, the person upon whom the force was used was an incompetent person.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 7 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 26 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

Definition of “force,” “incompetent person,” “nondeadly force” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Justification: defense — AS

11.81.300

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: V, 15-18.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a), substituted “on” for “upon” in three places and in (5), inserted “or advanced practice registered” twice, both preceding “nurse”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Corporal punishment in public schools is probably legal, so long as it is “reasonable” under the common law doctrine of in loco parentis, state statutes regarding child abuse, and constitutional provisions regarding cruel and unusual punishment.
January 30, 1986, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 11.81.440.
Duress.

In any prosecution for an offense, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant engaged in the proscribed conduct because the defendant was coerced to do so by the use of unlawful force upon the defendant or a third person, which force a reasonable person in the defendant’s situation would have been unable to resist.

The defense of duress is not available when one recklessly places oneself in a situation in which it is probable that one will be subject to duress.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “affirmative defense,” “force” — AS

11.81.900

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: V, 18-20.

Sec. 11.81.450.
Entrapment.

In any prosecution for an offense, it is an affirmative defense that, in order to obtain evidence of the commission of an offense, a public law enforcement official or a person working in cooperation with the official induced the defendant to commit the offense by persuasion or inducement as would be effective to persuade an average person, other than one who is ready and willing, to commit the offense.
Inducement or persuasion which would induce only a person engaged in an habitual course of unlawful conduct for gain or profit does not constitute entrapment.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “affirmative defense” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: V, 20-22.